Utah statutes.
63M-1-802.   Management fees.

(1)  All expenses incurred in establishing and maintaining shared foreign sales corporations shall be initially paid for by the office but shall be reimbursed to the office by the participants in each shared foreign sales corporation created under Section 63M-1-801 on a pro rata basis determined by the office.

(2)  The office may charge the participants management fees that are reasonable to maintain and manage each of the shared foreign sales corporations.

(3)  All money obtained by the office in excess of office expenditures in connection with the management of shared foreign sales corporations may be used at the discretion of the office for the office's other activities in promoting exporting.

(4)  The fees collected and the expenditures made shall be reported to the Legislature each year.

